Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Disposition of Department Lands.

§ 10.1-108.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Environment”
means the natural, scenic, scientific and historic attributes of the Commonwealth.

“Exploration”
means the examination and investigation of land for the purpose of locating and determining the extent of minerals, by excavating, drilling, boring, sinking shafts, sinking wells, driving tunnels, or other means.

“Mineral”
means petroleum, natural gas, coal, ore, rock and any other solid chemical element or compound which results from the inorganic process of nature. For the purposes of this article, the word mineral shall not include timber.

History.

1978, c. 835, § 10-17.113; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-109.
Lease of lands and other properties.

The Director is authorized, subject to the written recommendation of the Department of General Services to the Governor and the written approval of the Governor, following review as to form and content by the Attorney General and the provisions of this article, to lease to any person for consideration, by appropriate instrument signed and executed by the Director, in the name of the Commonwealth: (i) any lands or other properties held for general recreational or other public purposes by the Department, for the Commonwealth, or (ii) any lands over which the Department has supervision and control, or any part of such lands where such lease is for the purposes of recreation, agriculture, or resource management and is consistent with the purposes and duties of the Department. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (ii), whenever land is acquired by purchase or otherwise for public recreation and conservation purposes under the administration of the Department, the Director is authorized to lease the land or any portion of it back to the owner from whom the land is acquired upon terms and conditions in the public interest. No lease granted under this section shall be for an initial term longer than ten years, but any such lease may contain provisions for lease renewals, either contingent or automatic at the discretion of the Director, for a like period upon the same terms and conditions as originally granted. If written notice of termination is received by the Director from the lessee or if use of the lease is in fact abandoned by the lessee at any time prior to the end of the initial term or any renewal, the Director may immediately terminate the lease.

The Director is authorized to lease state-owned housing under the control of the Department to state employees. Such leases shall be approved as to form and content by the Attorney General and the Department of General Services. The leasing of Department-controlled housing to state employees shall be for the purposes of providing security and operational efficiencies to property of the Department and shall not cause the property to be considered surplus to the agency’s need. If the Director determines that the availability of state-owned housing is inadequate to meet the onsite security and operational efficiencies requirements for Department-owned property, he may lease residential property not owned by the Commonwealth from prospective landlords for the purposes of subleasing to state employees who otherwise qualify for leasing state-owned housing. Such leases and subleases shall be approved by the Director.

Property leased under this section shall not be considered surplus to the agency’s need.

The Department shall include information about leasing activities carried out pursuant to this section in an annual report to the General Assembly.

History.

1978, c. 835, § 10-17.114; 1980, c. 451; 1984, c. 739; 1987, c. 453; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 461; 2008, c. 22; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 400.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1987, c. 52, cl. 1 and 2, provided that the Director of the Department of Conservation and Historic Resources (now Department of Conservation and Recreation) could execute the appropriate instruments necessary to convey real estate in the Appalachian Trail held in the name of the Commonwealth to the United States of America, Department of the Interior, National Park Service in exchange for real estate in the Appalachian Trail held in the name of the United States of America, and that any such instruments were subject to former § 10-17.114 (now §§

10.1-109

through

10.1-112

), including review and approval by the Board of Conservation and Historic Resources (Board of Conservation and Recreation), approval by the Governor and approval of the Attorney General as to form and content. Instruments were executed in October, 1987, from the United States to Virginia and from Virginia to the United States making such conveyances.

Acts 1998, c. 248, cl. 1 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to lease to the Chesapeake Bay Foundation, Inc., upon terms as the Department deems proper, with the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General, that parcel of land known as the Jammes property, containing 8.8781 acres, more or less, as shown on a boundary survey recorded in the Office of the Clerk of the Circuit Court of Fairfax County, Virginia, in Deed Book 9501, page 985, together with a parcel adjoining the northwest corner of the Jammes property and providing access to Occoquan Bay, both parcels being a portion of Mason Neck State Park in Fairfax County. The terms of the lease shall require the lessee to make substantial renovations to the existing improvements on the Jammes property, and shall provide that the parcels shall be used as the situs of environmental education programs and such other uses as the Department and the lessee determine are consistent with the purposes for which the parcels were acquired by the Commonwealth. The initial term of this lease shall be for thirty years, and the lease shall be renewable at the option of the lessee for like periods upon the same terms and conditions as the initial lease term. Prior to execution, the lease shall be submitted to the chairmen of the Senate Finance Committee, the Senate Committee for Courts of Justice, the House Committee on Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Appropriations Committee for review.”

Acts 1998, c. 282, cls. 1 and 2 provide: “§ 1. That notwithstanding the lease term limits under §

10.1-109

, the initial term of this lease shall be for a term of thirty years and may be renewed for three additional periods of similar length. All lease renewals shall require the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General.”

“2. Notwithstanding the lease term limits under §

10.1-109

, the initial term of this lease shall be for a term of thirty years and may be renewed for three additional periods of similar length. All lease renewals shall require the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General.”

Acts 2000, c. 263, cls. 1 and 2 provide: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to lease to Franklin County, upon terms and conditions the Department deems proper, with the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General, a certain parcel of land located on Smith Mountain Lake in Franklin County containing thirty-seven acres, more or less. The lease shall require that the property be developed, maintained, and kept open for public recreational use; if this condition is not satisfied, the lease shall terminate and control of the property shall revert to the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“§ 2. Notwithstanding the lease term limits under §

10.1-109

, the initial term of this lease shall be for a term of thirty years and may be renewed for three additional periods of similar length. All lease renewals shall require the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General.”

Acts 2000, c. 371, cls. 1 to 3 provide: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to convey to Woodland Pond, upon such terms as the Department deems proper with the approval of the National Park Service, Governor and Attorney General, a certain parcel of real property containing approximately one acre on the southeast boundary of Pocahontas State Park in Chesterfield County.

“§ 2. In consideration for such conveyance, the Department is authorized to accept on behalf of the boundary of approximately equal acreage and of equal or greater economic and recreational value.

“§ 3. The exchange of real property shall be for due consideration as determined by the Department and Woodland Pond.

“The deeds of conveyance shall be in the form approved by the Attorney General.”

Acts 2001, c. 247, cls. 1 to 3 provide: “§ 1. That, in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-104

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to acquire, with the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General, that certain parcel of real property and appurtenances thereto, consisting of 154 acres, plus or minus, known as the Mary B. Stratton Estate property fronting on State Route 643, in Chesterfield County.

“§ 2.
Further, in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to lease to Chesterfield County upon terms and conditions the Department deems proper, with approval of the Governor, the above described property. The lease shall require that the property be maintained and open to public recreational use. If this condition is not met, the lease shall terminate and control shall revert to the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“§ 3.
Notwithstanding the lease term limits under §

10.1-109

, the initial term of this lease shall be for a term of thirty years and may be renewed for three additional periods of similar length. All lease renewals shall require approval of the Governor.”

Acts 2002, c. 809, cls. 1-6, as amended by Acts 2004, c. 825 and Acts 2006, c. 39, provide:

“§ 1. That, in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §§

10.1-104

and

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to amend on behalf of the Commonwealth, upon terms and conditions the Department deems proper, with approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General, a certain lease by and between the Secretary of the Army and the Commonwealth of Virginia. Department of Conservation and Recreation, and to enter into a sublease on behalf of the Commonwealth, upon terms and conditions that the Department deems proper, with approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General, with any public entity for a portion of the Occoneechee State Park in Mecklenburg County.

“§ 2. The purpose of the amendment is to allow certain property currently owned by the federal government and leased by the Commonwealth within Occoneechee State Park, if approved by the federal government, to be used for a recreational facility not operated under the purview of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, if approved by the federal government.

“§ 3. The amendment to the lease shall be subject to (i) the public participation guidelines of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) and (ii) inclusion in the master plan for the park.

“§ 4. The sublease shall require approval by the Secretary of the Army.

“§ 5. Any further subletting of the property by the public entity shall be to another public entity and shall be subject to review and approval by the Department, with approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General. Upon expiration of the sublease, or when the subleasee no longer wishes to have the property operated under the terms of the sublease, the subleasee shall return the property to the Department in the condition specified by the sublease.

“§ 6. The provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2008, unless the amendment has been incorporated into the lease agreement by July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2003, c. 100, cls. 1 and 2, provide: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to convey to the Mount Vernon Ladies’ Association of the Union, upon terms as the Department deems proper, with the approval of the Governor, and the Attorney General as to form of the instrument of conveyance, certain parcels of real property containing 15.4 acres more or less, located in Fairfax County adjacent to George Washington’s grist mill.

“§ 2. If such property is conveyed to the Mount Vernon Ladies’ Association of the Union, the deed shall require that the property be maintained for and open to public use. If this condition is not met, the property shall revert to the Department of Conservation and Recreation.”

Acts 2009, c. 689 provides: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to convey to the Department of Forestry, upon terms and conditions as the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Forestry deem proper, and with the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General, also as required by §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, all of its right, title, and interest in a portion of land approved by the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and located in or adjacent to Grayson Highlands State Park in Grayson County. The boundaries of such conveyance shall be determined by mutual agreement of the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Forestry.

“§ 2. That as a prior condition to such conveyance, the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Forestry shall mutually ascertain the existence of or, if necessary, acquire public road access to said property acceptable to the Department of Forestry.

“§ 3. That in exchange for such conveyance, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is authorized to receive, and the Department of Forestry is authorized to convey, upon terms and conditions as the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Forestry deem proper, and with the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General pursuant to § 2.2-1150 of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Forestry’s rights, title, and interest in a portion of land approved by the State Forester, and adjoining Holliday Lake State Park in Appomattox County. The boundaries of such conveyance shall be determined by mutual agreement of the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Department of Forestry.

“§ 4. That the purpose of this exchange is to provide the Department of Conservation and Recreation with additional property for the possible future expansion of Holliday Lake State Park and the protection of its viewshed, and to provide the Department of Forestry with a location for research and seed sources for native species.

“§ 5. That as may be required, the conveyances authorized shall additionally comply with the requirements of the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act, 16 U.S.C. § 4601-4 et seq.”

Acts 2011, c. 696, provides: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, and after judicial approval, as required by the deed of December 28, 2009, the Department of Conservation and Recreation (the Department) is hereby authorized to convey to Muffin Trodding, LLC, Yancey Hardtimes, LLC, and Ms. Elizabeth Breeden, their successors and assigns, separately or together, upon terms and conditions as the Department and the grantees deem proper, and with the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General, all of its right, title, and interest in a parcel or parcels of land that are a part of the 1,191 acres, more or less, known as Biscuit Run in Albemarle County, Virginia, owned by the Department, or such other parcel or parcels of land in proximity to the Biscuit Run property that the Department acquires for the purpose of this exchange. The acreage and boundaries of such parcels shall be determined by mutual agreement of the Department and the grantees, but in no instance shall the negotiated monetary value of the property conveyed from the Property, if unrestricted by the terms of the Deed of Bargain and Sale, exceed the value of the property and life estate described in § 2 hereof. Such acreage and boundaries, and the value thereof, shall be approved by the Director of the Department of General Services. The value of such parcels shall be no more than the value, or the remainder interest value if conveyed subject to a life estate, of the 36 acres, more or less, contemplated in § 2 hereof to be received in exchange therefor by the Department. If the land deeded to Muffin Trodding, LLC, Yancey Hardtimes, LLC, and Ms. Elizabeth Breeden by virtue of this act is taken from the Biscuit Run property, such land shall be subject to all the restrictions contained in the Deed of Bargain and Sale that conveyed Biscuit Run to the Commonwealth until such time as the restrictions are extinguished by a judicial proceeding as provided for in the Deed of Bargain and Sale.

“§ 2. That in exchange for such conveyance, the Department is authorized to receive, subject to the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General and subject to § 2.2-1149 of the Code of Virginia, all the respective right, title, and interest in 36 acres, more or less, owned by Muffin Trodding, LLC, Yancey Hardtimes, LLC, and Ms. Elizabeth Breeden, their successors and assigns, located in the interior of the property known as Biscuit Run. The boundaries of such conveyance shall be determined by mutual agreement of the Department and the owners. The Department is further authorized to allow for the reservation of a life estate in any portion of those 36 acres, more or less, as part of the exchange. The boundaries of such 36 acres, more or less, and the value thereof, including the value of the remainder interest if conveyed subject to a life estate, shall be approved by the Director of the Department of General Services.

“§ 3. That the purpose of this exchange is to provide the Department with a state park site that is less encumbered with private uses that may be detrimental to the operation of a state park on the property.”

Acts 2012, c. 14, provides: “§ 1. That in accordance with and as evidence of General Assembly approval pursuant to §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to convey to Amherst County, upon terms and conditions that the Department deems proper, and with the approval of the Governor and in a form approved by the Attorney General as required by §

10.1-109

of the Code of Virginia, any right, title, or interest that it may have in 31.153 acres, more or less, lying adjacent to the James River at State Route 1004 in Amherst County, Virginia, as more particularly described by deed recorded in the Clerk’s Office of the Amherst County Circuit Court in Deed Book 784, Page 145.

§ 2. Any conveyance shall require that the property be maintained and open to public recreational use, and that if this condition is not met, the property shall revert to the Department.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 22, in subsection B, inserted “and operational efficiencies” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 400, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “written recommendation of the Department of General Services to the Governor and the written approval of the Governor” for “consent and approval of the Governor and the General Assembly,” “to lease to any person for consideration, by” for “convey, lease or demise to any person for consideration, by proper deed or other,” and “where such lease is for the purposes of recreation, agriculture, or resource management and is consistent with the purposes and duties of the Department. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (ii), whenever” for “(iii) any right, interest or privilege with respect to such lands. The Director, subject to the consent and approval of the Governor, may renew any such lease, contract or agreement without the consent and approval of the General Assembly. Whenever,” deleted “proper deed or other” preceding “appropriate instrument”; added subsection C and D; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-110.
Easements to governmental agencies and public service corporations.

The Director is authorized, subject to the consent and approval of the Governor following review as to form and content by the Attorney General, to grant to any governmental agency, political subdivision, public utility company, public service corporation, public service company or authority for consideration by proper deed or other appropriate instrument signed and executed by the Director in the name of the Commonwealth, any easement over, upon and across any lands or other properties held by the Commonwealth or over which it has supervision and control, provided that the easement is consistent with and not in derogation of the general purpose for which the land or other property is held. No easement shall be granted for an initial term longer than ten years, but may contain provisions for renewals either contingent or automatic at the discretion of the Director, for a like period on the same terms and conditions as originally granted. If written notice of termination is received by the Director from the grantee or if use of the easement is in fact abandoned by the grantee at any time prior to the end of the initial term or any renewal, the Director may immediately terminate the easement. If the Department amends its master site plan to include buildings, structures or improvements on or in the vicinity of any easement granted under this section, the Director reserves the right to require, upon written notice given 180 days in advance, the relocation of the easement at the expense of the grantee of the easement.

The relocation requirement of subsection A shall not apply to any easement granted by the Director to the Virginia Department of Transportation.

History.

1978, c. 835, § 10-17.114; 1980, c. 451; 1984, c. 739; 1987, c. 453; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 360.

§ 10.1-111.
Removal of minerals.

The Director, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to make and execute leases, contracts or deeds in the name of the Commonwealth, for the removal or mining of minerals that may be found in Departmental lands whenever it appears to the Director that it would be in the best interest of the Commonwealth to dispose of these minerals. Before any deed, contract or lease is made or executed, it shall be approved as to form by the Attorney General, and bids therefor shall be received after notice by publication once each week for four successive weeks in two newspapers of general circulation. The Director shall have the right to reject any or all bids and to readvertise for bids. The accepted bidder shall give bond with good and sufficient surety to the satisfaction of the Director, and in any amount that the Director may fix for the faithful performance of all the conditions and covenants of the lease, contract or deed. The proceeds arising from any contract, deed, or lease shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the State Park Conservation Resources Fund established in subsection A of §

10.1-202

.

History.

1978, c. 835, § 10-17.114; 1980, c. 451; 1984, c. 739; 1987, c. 453; 1988, c. 891; 2003, cc. 79, 89.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and in the last sentence, inserted “State Park,” and “subsection A of.”

§ 10.1-112.
Capital improvement projects.

The Director is authorized to make and execute leases and contracts in the name of the Commonwealth for the development and operation of revenue-producing capital improvement projects in Virginia state parks upon the written approval of the Governor. Prior to approval, the Governor shall consider the written recommendation of the Director of the Department of General Services and the Attorney General shall review such leases and contracts as to form.

Any contract or lease for the development and operation of the capital improvement project shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§ 2.2-4300 et seq.). The accepted bidder shall give a performance bond for the construction, operation and maintenance of the project with good and sufficient surety in an amount fixed by the Director for the faithful performance of the conditions and covenants of such lease or contract.

Such lease or contract, with an initial term not exceeding
30 years, shall be subject to terms, conditions, and limitations as the Director may prescribe and may be renewed with the approval of the Director. The proceeds arising from a contract or lease executed pursuant to this section shall be paid into the State Park Conservation Resources Fund established in subsection A of §

10.1-202

.

History.

1987, c. 835, § 10-17.114; 1980, c. 451; 1984, c. 739; 1987, c. 453; 1988, c. 891; 1998, c. 168; 2003, cc. 79, 89.

The 1998 amendment

substituted “thirty years” for “twenty-five years” in the first sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and in the last paragraph, substituted “30” for “thirty” in the first sentence, and in the last sentence inserted “State Park” and “subsection A of.”

§ 10.1-113.
Sale of trees.

For the purpose of managing Departmental lands or maintaining the production of forest products in Departmental lands, the Director, upon the recommendation of the State Forester, may designate and appraise trees to be cut under the principles of scientific forest management, and may sell them for not less than their appraised value. When the appraised value of the trees to be sold is more than $50,000, the Director, before selling them, shall receive bids, after notice by publication once a week for two weeks in two newspapers of general circulation; but the Director shall have the right to reject any and all bids and to readvertise for bids. The proceeds arising from the sale of the timber and trees from state park lands shall be paid into the State Park Conservation Resources Fund established in subsection A of §

10.1-202

. The proceeds arising from the sale of the timber and trees from natural area preserves owned by the Department in fee simple shall be paid into the Natural Area Preservation Fund established in §

10.1-215

.

History.

1988, c. 891; 2003, cc. 79, 89; 2007, c. 158.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and in the last sentence, inserted “State Park” and “subsection A of.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 158 inserted “managing Departmental lands or” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “$50,000” for “$10,000” in the second sentence, inserted “from state park lands” in the next-to-last sentence and added the last sentence.

§ 10.1-114.
Commemorative facilities and historic sites management; duties of Director.

In order to further public understanding and appreciation of the persons, places and events that contributed substantially to the development and enhancement of our Commonwealth’s and nation’s democratic and social values and ideals and in order to encourage, stimulate and support the identification, protection, preservation and rehabilitation of the Department’s significant historic, architectural and archaeological sites, the Director has the following duties:

To ensure that Departmental historical and cultural facilities are suitable for public, patriotic, educational and recreational assemblies and events;

To plan, establish, construct, operate, maintain and manage historic museums, commemorative memorials and other facilities as directed by acts of the General Assembly;

To acquire lands, property and structures deemed necessary to the purposes of this chapter by purchase, lease, gift, devise or condemnation proceedings. The title to land and property acquired shall be in the name of the Commonwealth. In the exercise of the power of eminent domain granted under this section, the Director may proceed in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1; and

To lease acquired property to any person, association, firm or corporation for terms and conditions determined by the Director with the Governor’s consent.

History.

1989, c. 656; 2003, c. 940.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 substituted “Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1” for “§§ 33.1-89 through 33.1-132” in subdivision 3.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 2.

§ 10.1-114.1.
Directory of cultural heritage sites.

The Director is authorized to develop a state directory of cultural heritage facilities and sites. The directory shall recognize commemorative and historic facilities and sites that interpret significant aspects of national, state, or regional culture or history. Sites included in the directory shall not be owned or operated by state agencies.

Owners or managers of a potential commemorative or historic facility desiring to be included in the directory of cultural heritage sites shall submit an application to the Department. To be eligible for inclusion in the directory, the application shall include a discussion of the cultural and historic significance of the facility or site; a description of how the facility or site is staffed and managed; information on any oversight or advisory boards, including their mission statements and goals; information regarding the accessibility of the site to persons with special needs; information confirming the availability of the facility or site to the public for tours and educational or recreational programs on a regular basis; letters of support from local governments, chambers of commerce, tourism bureaus, or other supporting entities; and other information as the Department determines to be necessary. The Department may develop additional qualification criteria and application materials that may be necessary to implement the registry program. Such criteria may be adopted by the Director after considering the recommendations of the Board of Conservation and Recreation.

The Director shall evaluate whether the facility or site qualifies for inclusion in the directory. In evaluating the facility or site, the Director shall consult with the Department of Historic Resources, the Virginia Tourism Corporation, and other state and federal agencies when such consultation would benefit the evaluation.

The Director shall present any findings to the Board for its recommendation. Upon the favorable recommendation of the Board, the Director may designate a facility or site for inclusion in the directory with the Governor’s written approval.

The Department shall maintain the directory of cultural heritage facilities and sites on its website and actively promote those facilities or sites.

History.

2010, c. 29.